gl_ES.aff
FLAG num
# abstiver afixer antepuxer apuxer arrepuxer ativer compuxer contiver contrafixer contrapuxer couber depuxer 
# desafixer desapuxer descompuxer desfixer detiver dispuxer empuxer entretiver entrevir expuxer fixer for houber 
# impuxer indispuxer interpuxer mantiver obtiver opuxer pospuxer predispuxer presupuxer previr propuxer prouguer 
# puider puxer quixer rarefixer recompuxer refixer reimpuxer repuxer retiver revir satisfixer sobreexpuxer sostiver 
# souber subexpuxer superpuxer supuxer tiver traspuxer trouxer tumefixer valer vir xustapuxer 
SFX 324  Y    62     #2C irregular
SFX 324  r    ches    [^l]er	.	ds:pretérito P2
SFX 324  er    éches/666,100,112,113    [^l]er	.	ds:pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    iches    valer	.	ds:pretérito P2
SFX 324  er    íches/666,100,112,113    valer	.	ds:pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    iches    vir	.	ds:pretérito P2
SFX 324  ir    íches/666,100,112,113    vir	.	ds:pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  or    uches    for	.	ds:pretérito P2
SFX 324  or    úches/666,100,112,113    for	.	ds:pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    o    [^lu]er	.	ds:pretérito P3
SFX 324  guer    go    guer	.	ds:pretérito P3
SFX 324  er    eu/101,114    valer	.	ds:pretérito P3 [ + acusativo P3 tras ditongo decrecente / enclítico monosílabo]
SFX 324  er    éu/666,115    valer	.	ds:pretérito P3 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 324  ir    iu/101,114    vir	.	ds:pretérito P3 [ + acusativo P3 tras ditongo decrecente / enclítico monosílabo]
SFX 324  ir    íu/666,115    vir	.	ds:pretérito P3 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 324  r    i/101,114    for	.	ds:pretérito P3 [ + acusativo P3 tras ditongo decrecente / enclítico monosílabo]
SFX 324  or    ói/666,115    for	.	ds:pretérito P3 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 324  r    mos    r	.	ds:pretérito P4
SFX 324  or    ómos/666,100,116,117    or	.	ds:pretérito P4 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    émos/666,100,116,117    er	.	ds:pretérito P4 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    ímos/666,100,116,117    ir	.	ds:pretérito P4 + enclítico
SFX 324  r    stes    r	.	ds:pretérito P5
SFX 324  or    óstes/666,100,118,119    or	.	ds:pretérito P5 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    éstes/666,100,118,119    er	.	ds:pretérito P5 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    ístes/666,100,118,119    ir	.	ds:pretérito P5 + enclítico
SFX 324  0    on    r	.	ds:pretérito P6
SFX 324  or    óron/666,100,114,115    or	.	ds:pretérito P6 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    éron/666,100,114,115    er	.	ds:pretérito P6 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    íron/666,100,114,115    ir	.	ds:pretérito P6 + enclítico
SFX 324  0    a    r	.	ds:antepretérito P1 / P3
SFX 324  or    óra/666,100,110,111,114,115    or	.	ds:antepretérito P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    éra/666,100,110,111,114,115    er	.	ds:antepretérito P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    íra/666,100,110,111,114,115    ir	.	ds:antepretérito P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 324  0    as    r	.	ds:antepretérito P2
SFX 324  or    óras/666,100,112,113    or	.	ds:antepretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    éras/666,100,112,113    er	.	ds:antepretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    íras/666,100,112,113    ir	.	ds:antepretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  0    amos    r	.	ds:antepretérito P4
SFX 324  0    ámos/666,100,116,117    r	.	ds:antepretérito P4 + enclítico
SFX 324  0    ades    r	.	ds:antepretérito P5
SFX 324  0    ádes/666,100,118,119    r	.	ds:antepretérito P5 + enclítico
SFX 324  0    an    r	.	ds:antepretérito P6
SFX 324  or    óran/666,100,114,115    or	.	ds:antepretérito P6 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    éran/666,100,114,115    er	.	ds:antepretérito P6 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    íran/666,100,114,115    ir	.	ds:antepretérito P6 + enclítico
SFX 324  r    se    r	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P1 / P3
SFX 324  er    ése/666,100,110,111,114,115    er	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 324  or    óse/666,100,110,111,114,115    or	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    íse/666,100,110,111,114,115    ir	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P1 / P3 + enclítico
SFX 324  r    ses    r	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P2
SFX 324  or    óses/666,100,112,113    or	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    éses/666,100,112,113    er	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    íses/666,100,112,113    ir	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324  er    ésemos/100,116,117    er	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P4 [ + enclítico]
SFX 324  ir    ísemos/100,118,119    ir	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P4 [ + enclítico]
SFX 324  or    ósemos/100,118,119    or	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P4 [ + enclítico]
SFX 324  er    ésedes/100,118,119    er	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P5 [ + enclítico]
SFX 324  ir    ísedes/100,118,119    ir	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P5 [ + enclítico]
SFX 324  or    ósedes/100,118,119    or	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P5 [ + enclítico]
SFX 324  r    sen    r	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P6
SFX 324  er    ésen/666,100,114,115    er	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P6 + enclítico
SFX 324  ir    ísen/666,100,114,115    ir	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P6 + enclítico
SFX 324  or    ósen/666,100,114,115    or	.	ds:subxuntivo pretérito P6 + enclítico

# abstiver afixer antepuxer apuxer arrepuxer ativer compuxer contiver contrafixer contrapuxer couber depuxer desafixer desapuxer 
# descompuxer desfixer detiver dispuxer empuxer entretiver expuxer fixer for houber impuxer indispuxer interpuxer mantiver obtiver 
# opuxer pospuxer predispuxer presupuxer propuxer prouguer puider puxer quixer rarefixer recompuxer refixer reimpuxer repuxer 
# retiver satisfixer sobreexpuxer sostiver souber subexpuxer superpuxer supuxer tiver traspuxer trouxer tumefixer valer vir xustapuxer 
SFX 325  Y    7     #S2C irregular
SFX 325  r    n    [^l]er	.	ds:pretérito P1
SFX 325  aler    alín/111    valer	.	ds:pretérito P1 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 325  aler    alin/666,100,110    valer	.	ds:pretérito P1 + enclítico monosílabo
SFX 325  ir    in/100,110    vir	.	ds:pretérito P1 [ + enclítico monosílabo]
SFX 325  ir    ín/666,111    vir	.	ds:pretérito P1 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 325  or    un/100,110    for	.	ds:pretérito P1 [ + enclítico monosílabo]
SFX 325  or    ún/666,111    for	.	ds:pretérito P1 + enclítico polisílabo
